Washington statutes.
RCW 43.340.060

Bonds—Obligations of authority—Not obligations of state.

(1) Bonds issued under this chapter shall be issued in the name of the authority. The bonds shall not be obligations of the state of Washington and shall be obligations only of the authority, payable solely from the special fund or funds created by the authority for their payment.

(2) Bonds issued under this chapter shall contain a recital on their face to the effect that payment of the principal of, interest on, and prepayment premium, if any, on the bonds shall be a valid claim only as against the special fund or funds relating thereto, that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state or any municipal corporation, subdivision, or agency of the state, other than the authority as set forth in this chapter, is pledged to the payment of the principal of, interest on, and prepayment premium, if any, on the bonds.

(3) Contracts entered into by the authority shall be entered into in the name of the authority and not in the name of the state of Washington. The obligations of the authority under the contracts shall be obligations only of the authority and are not in any way obligations of the state of Washington.

[ 2002 c 365 s 4.]